Illinois, session 104th, HB5761.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $150,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for the ordinary and contingent expenses of the Commission on 8Artificial Intelligence and Workforce Transition and to 9conduct the assessments required under the Commission on 10Artificial Intelligence and Workforce Transition Act. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122026.